Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 1. Voting Machines
[Repealed].

§§ 23-7-1 and 23-7-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 486, § 338, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 3316-01, 3316-24; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, §§ 1, 24]

§§ 23-7-5 through 23-7-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-7-5. [Codes, 1942, § 3316-02; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 387, § 1]

§§23-7-7 through23-7-51. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3316-03 to 3316-23; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, §§ 3-26]